Utah statutes.
41-6a-1618.   Sale or use of unapproved lighting equipment or devices
prohibited.
(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (2), a person may not use, have for
sale, sell, or offer for sale for use on or as a part of the equipment of a
motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer any head lamp, auxiliary
fog lamp, rear lamp, signal lamp, required reflector, or any parts of that
equipment which tend to change the original design or performance, unless the
part or equipment complies with the specifications adopted under Section
41-6a-1601.
(2)  The provisions of Subsection (1) do not apply to equipment in actual use
prior to July 1, 1979 or to replacement parts of this equipment.
(3)  A person may not use on a motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or pole
trailer any lamps under this section unless the lamps are mounted, adjusted,
and aimed in accordance with this part.
